Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB40.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 173.490 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) One-third (1/3) of the persons first appointed to the board shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-
third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and one-third (1/3) for a term of four (4) years. Where the board
consists of a number of members not divisible by three (3), one-third (1/3) of the next higher number
divisible by three (3), shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3)
years, and the remaining number shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, as their terms
expire, the board shall make recommendations on their successors, who shall be appointed as set out in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) 1. The board shall recommend two (2) persons committed to the provision of library services to the[
Department for Libraries and Archives for each vacancy. The names shall be forwarded to the
Department for Libraries and Archives and the state librarian and commissioner shall
recommend those names to the] county judge/executive for each vacancy, unless the fiscal
court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution as
set forth in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph. The county judge/executive shall within thirty
(30) days[immediately], with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those
recommended unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process[ through the
passage of a resolution]. Within fourteen (14) days, the board shall notify the Department for
Libraries and Archives of the name of any person appointed.
2. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process through the passage of a
resolution, the board shall recommend one (1) person committed to the provision of library
services to the county judge/executive, who:
[1. ]a. May within thirty (30) days[immediately], with the approval of the fiscal court,
make the selection from the person recommended by the board[ those recommended by
the state librarian and commissioner]; or[and]
b. Shall, if he or she determines that the person recommended by the board is
unacceptable,[For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to fill from
the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to
submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled
appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those
recommendations; and
2. For any remaining unfilled appointments after the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph have been followed, shall] appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court,
individuals of his or her choosing no later than thirty (30) days after rejecting the board's
recommendation[day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under
subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph and made no appointment therefrom]. The
board[county judge/executive] shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives,
within fourteen (14) days of the appointment, of the name of any individual appointed by
the alternative appointment process[in the manner set out in this subparagraph].
(c) Board members [thus appointed ]shall serve a term of four (4) years each, and[. Trustees] may serve for
two (2) consecutive terms after which they shall not succeed themselves. They may be reappointed no
earlier than twelve (12) months following the end of their last service. The members shall hold office
until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. After absence of a trustee from four (4)
regular monthly meetings of the board during any one (1) year of the trustee's term, the trustee shall be
considered to have automatically resigned from the board. An advisory board may be appointed and
serve as specified in the bylaws of the board of trustees.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) Any vacancy occurring in the terms of office of members shall be filled for the unexpired term by the county
judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal court, by appointment on recommendation of the board[state
librarian and commissioner] of two (2)[ names of] persons committed to the provision of library services and
living in the county in which the vacancy occurred unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative
appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative
appointment process, the board shall recommend one (1) person committed to the provision of library
services and living in the county to the county judge/executive, who:
(a) [1. ]May within thirty (30) days[immediately], with the approval of the fiscal court, appoint the
person recommended by the board[ make the appointment on the recommendation of the state
librarian and commissioner of two (2) names of persons committed to the provision of library services
and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred]; or[and
2. If the county judge/executive decides not to make the appointment from the first
recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within
thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for the unfilled appointment, and, with
the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and]
(b) Shall, if he or she determines that the person recommended by the board is unacceptable,[For any
remaining unfilled appointment after the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection have been
followed, shall] appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, an individual of his or her choosing no
later than thirty (30) days after rejecting the board's recommendation[day the county judge/executive
received the recommendations under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection and made no appointment
therefrom]. Any person appointed in accordance with this subsection[paragraph] shall be committed to
the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred. The
board[county judge/executive] shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives, within fourteen
(14) days of the appointment, of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this
subsection[paragraph].
(3) A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS 65.007.
(4) Any person appointed to the board shall be committed to the provision of library services and living in the
county in which the board operates.
Section 2. KRS 173.730 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) One-third (1/3) of the persons first appointed to the board shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-
third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and one-third (1/3) for a term of four (4) years. Where the board
consists of a number of members not divisible by three (3), one-third (1/3) of the next higher number
divisible by three (3), shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years
and the remaining number shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, as their terms expire, the
board shall make recommendations on their successors, who shall be appointed as set out in paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(b) 1. The board shall recommend two (2) persons committed to the provision of library services to the[
Department for Libraries and Archives, for each vacancy. The state librarian and commissioner
shall recommend those names to the] county judge/executive for each vacancy, unless the fiscal
court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution as
set forth in this paragraph. The county judge/executive shall within thirty (30)
days[immediately], with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those
recommended unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process[ through the
passage of a resolution]. Within fourteen (14) days, the board shall notify the Department for
Libraries and Archives of the name of any person appointed.
2. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process through the passage of a
resolution, the board shall recommend one (1) person committed to the provision of library
services to the county judge/executive, who:
[1. ]a. May within thirty (30) days[immediately], with the approval of the fiscal court,
make the selection from the person recommended by the board[those recommended by
the state librarian and commissioner]; or[and]
b. Shall, if he or she determines that the person recommended by the board is
unacceptable,[For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to fill from

CHAPTER 13 3
the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to
submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled
appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those
recommendations; and
2. For any remaining unfilled appointments after the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph have been followed, shall] appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court,
individuals of his or her choosing no later than thirty (30) days after rejecting the board's
recommendation[day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under of
subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph and made no appointment therefrom]. The
board[county judge/executive] shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives,
within fourteen (14) days of the appointment, of the name of any individual appointed by
the alternative appointment process[in the manner set out in this subparagraph].
(c) Board members [thus appointed ]shall serve a term of four (4) years each, and[. Trustees] may serve for
two (2) consecutive terms after which they shall not succeed themselves. They may be reappointed no
earlier than twelve (12) months following the end of their last service. The members shall hold office
until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. After absence of a trustee from four (4)
regular monthly meetings of the board during any one (1) year of the trustee's term, the trustee shall be
considered to have automatically resigned from the board. An advisory board may be appointed and
serve as specified in bylaws of the board of trustees.
(2) Any vacancy occurring in the terms of office of members shall be filled for the unexpired term by the county
judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal court, by appointment on recommendation of the board[state
librarian and commissioner] of two (2) persons interested in the provision of library services and living in the
county in which the vacancy occurred unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process
through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the board
shall recommend one (1) person committed to the provision of library services and living in the county to
the county judge/executive, who:
(a) [1. ]May within thirty (30) days[immediately], with the approval of the fiscal court, appoint the
person recommended by the board[make the appointment on the recommendation of the state librarian
and commissioner of two (2) persons interested in the provision of library services and living in the
county in which the vacancy occurred]; or[and
2. If the county judge/executive decides not to make the appointment from the first
recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within
thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for the unfilled appointment, and, with
the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and]
(b) Shall, if he or she determines that the person recommended by the board is unacceptable,[For any
remaining unfilled appointment after the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection have been
followed,] appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, an individual of his or her choosing no later
than thirty (30) days after rejecting the board's recommendation[day the county judge/executive
received the recommendations under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection and made no appointment
therefrom]. Any person appointed in accordance with this subsection[paragraph] shall be committed to
the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred. The
board[county judge/executive] shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives, within fourteen
(14) days of the appointment, of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this
subsection[paragraph].
(3) A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS 65.007.
(4) Any person appointed to the board shall be committed to the provision of library services and living in the
county in which the board operates.
Became law without Governor's signature April 2, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version